Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 35 Vaccinations for Firefighters, Emergency
Medical Technicians, and Public
Safety Officers

Code Commission notes.

This chapter, which was enacted as Chapter 34 of Title 31, was renumbered as Chapter 35 pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5 in light of the previous enactment of a Chapter 34 by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1234.